Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4258.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4258.1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Ethics Commission to be designated the
"Political Subdivisions Enforcement Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all funds appropriated by the Legislature to the fund and
all late filing fees, fines from settlement agreements and fines
assessed by the District Court for violations of the County Campaign
Finance and Financial Disclosure Act, the Municipal Campaign Finance
and Financial Disclosure Act, and the Technology Center District and
Independent School District Campaign Finance and Financial
Disclosure Act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Commission for any expenses incurred by the Political Subdivisions
Enforcement Division. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment. No later than January
31, 2016, and every year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall

transfer to the General Revenue Fund of the state any monies in the
fund in excess of One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00)
Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00). If at any time
the amount of money in the fund is less than One Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($100,000.00), the Executive Director of the Commission may
order that there be no further enforcement by the Political
Subdivisions Enforcement Division until the amount of money in the
fund is more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2795 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2795 Page 3